Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-320
Fish; propagation; stocking; removal by authority of commission; sale; proceeds.

The commission may take or authorize the taking of, at any time and in any manner, any fish or spawn belonging to the state for the purpose of propagation or stocking other waters or exchanging with the fish commissioner of other states or of the United States and may engage in the purchase, sale, and use of fish or fish eggs for stocking waters in this state. The proceeds of all sales of such fish, spawn, or eggs shall be paid into the State Game Fund.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 9, p. 429;

C.S.1929, § 37-509;

R.S.1943, § 37-509;

Laws 1959, c. 150, § 8, p. 574;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-509;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 78.